Massachusetts, session 194th, H310.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 23B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 5B the 
following section:- 
Section 5C. (a) As used in this section the following terms shall, unless the context 
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings: 
“Anti-displacement”, mitigation of the displacement of persons of color, immigrants, 
low- and moderate-income residents, persons with disabilities and members of other protected 
classes that may result from new development or substantial reconstruction, condemnation of 
property or other code enforcement, eminent domain takings, discrimination, gentrification, 
rising costs of living, zoning changes, limited housing availability or other causes. 

of 2 10  “Fair housing”, fair and equitable access to and opportunity in housing, free from 
prejudice, intolerance, bigotry and discrimination in housing. Fair housing shall include, but not 
be limited to, compliance with (i) federal fair housing laws, including 42 U.S.C. § 1982 et seq. 
and 42 U.S.C. § 3601 et seq.; and (ii) state laws relative to nondiscrimination in housing, 
including section 4 of chapter 151B. 
“Local planning and development agency”, a (i) redevelopment authority, as defined in 
section 1 of chapter 121B; (ii) municipal department of planning and development; or (iii) other 
municipal division responsible for the evaluation of land-development and use proposals for a 
municipality with a population more than 100,000 persons. 
(b) There shall be within the department a commission on equitable city planning and 
development. The commission shall consist of the director of the department or a designee, the 
executive director of the Massachusetts commission against discrimination or a designee and a 
tenant advocate to be appointed by the attorney general.  
(c) The commission shall require each local planning and development agency to 
periodically create an assessment of fair housing and anti-displacement in the municipality. 
Following each assessment, the local planning and development agency shall develop a plan to 
strengthen and improve fair housing and anti-displacement in the municipality. The local 
planning and development agency shall submit said plan to the department.  
(d) The department may promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out this 
section.